Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.36, is amended to read: 10A.36 REPRISALS PROHIBITED; PENALTY. new text begin (a) new text end An individual or association must not engage in economic reprisals or threaten loss of employment or physical coercion against an individual or association because of that individual's or association'snew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end political contributions or political activitynew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) refusal to communicate with public or local officials about a legislative or administrative action or the official action of a political subdivisionnew text end . new text begin (b) new text end This deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin sectionnew text end does not apply to compensation for employment or loss of employment if the political affiliation or viewpoint of the employee is a bona fide occupational qualification of the employment. new text begin (c) new text end An individual or association that violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.